Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
General Provisions

424.110.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

424.110

to

424.370

:

“Publication area” means the city, county, district, or other local area for which an advertisement is required by law to be made. An advertisement shall be deemed to be for a particular city, county, district, or other local area if it concerns an official activity of the city, county, district, or other area or of any governing body, board, commission, officer, agency, or court thereof, or if the subject of the advertisement concerns particularly the people of the city, county, district, or other area;

“Advertisement” means any matter required by law to be published; and

“Zoned edition” means a newspaper edition published at least once a week, distributed in a specific geographic region of the newspaper’s circulation area, and containing reporting and advertising of interest to subscribers in that geographic region.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 1; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1992, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

424.120.
Qualifications of newspapers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if an advertisement for a publication area is required by law to be published in a newspaper, the publication shall be made in a newspaper that meets the following requirements:

It shall be published in the publication area. A newspaper shall be deemed to be published in the area if it maintains its principal office in the area for the purpose of gathering news and soliciting advertisements and other general business of newspaper publications, and has a periodicals class mailing permit issued for that office. A newspaper published outside of Kentucky shall not be eligible to carry advertisements for any county or publication area within the county, other than for the city in which its main office is located, if there is a newspaper published in the county that has a substantial general circulation throughout the county and that otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and

It shall be of regular issue and have a bona fide circulation in the publication area. A newspaper shall be deemed to be of regular issue if it is published at least once a week, for at least fifty (50) weeks during the calendar year as prescribed by its mailing permit, and has been so published in the area for the immediately preceding two (2) year period. A newspaper meeting all the criteria to be of regular issue, except publication in the area for the immediately preceding two (2) year period, shall be deemed to be of regular issue if it is the only paper in the publication area and has a paid circulation equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the population of the publication area. A newspaper shall be deemed to be of bona fide circulation in the publication area if it is circulated generally in the area, and maintains a definite price or consideration not less than fifty percent (50%) of its published price, and is paid for by not less than fifty percent (50%) of those to whom distribution is made; and

It shall bear a title or name, consist of not less than four (4) pages without a cover, and be of a type to which the general public resorts for passing events of a political, religious, commercial, and social nature, and for current happenings, announcements, miscellaneous reading matter, advertisements, and other notices. The news content shall be at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total column space in more than one-half (1/2) of its issues during any twelve (12) month period.

If, in a publication area there is more than one (1) newspaper which meets the above requirements, the newspaper having the largest bona fide paid circulation as shown by the average number of paid copies of each issue as shown in its published statement of ownership as filed on October 1 for the publication area shall be the newspaper where advertisements required by law to be published shall be carried.

For the purposes of KRS Chapter 424, publishing shall be considered as the total recurring processes of producing the newspaper, embracing all of the included contents of reading matter, illustrations, and advertising enumerated in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection. A newspaper shall not be excluded from qualifying for the purposes of legal publications as provided in this chapter if its printing or reproduction processes take place outside the publication area.

If, in the case of a publication area smaller than the county in which it is located, there is no newspaper published in the area, the publication shall be made in a newspaper published in the county that is qualified under this section to publish advertisements for the county. If the qualified newspaper publishes a zoned edition which is distributed to regular subscribers within the publication area, any advertisement required by law to be published in the publication area may be published in the zoned edition distributed in that area.

If, in any county there is no newspaper meeting the requirements of this section for publishing advertisements for that county, any advertisements required to be published for the county or for any publication area within the county shall be published in a newspaper of the largest bona fide circulation in that county published in and qualified to publish advertisements for an adjoining county in Kentucky. This subsection is intended to supersede any statute that provides or contemplates that newspaper publication may be dispensed with if there is no newspaper printed or published or of general circulation in the particular publication area.

If a publication area consists of a district, other than a city, which extends into more than one (1) county, the part of the district in each county shall be considered to be a separate publication area for the purposes of this section, and an advertisement for each separate publication area shall be published in a newspaper qualified under this section to publish advertisements for the area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 2; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1982, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 430, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 9, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 8, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

424.130.
Times and periods of publication — Posting of delinquent tax lists.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

424.110

to

424.370

and notwithstanding any provision of existing law providing for different times or periods of publication, the times and periods of publications of advertisements required by law to be made in a newspaper shall be as follows:

When an advertisement is of a completed act, such as an ordinance, resolution, regulation, order, rule, report, statement, or certificate and the purpose of the publication is not to inform the public or the members of any class of persons that they may or shall do an act or exercise a right within a designated period or upon or by a designated date, the advertisement shall be published one (1) time only and within thirty (30) days after completion of the act. However, a failure to comply with this paragraph shall not invalidate any ordinance or resolution or subject a person to any of the penalties provided by KRS

424.990

unless such failure continues for a period of fifteen (15) days after notice to comply has been given him by registered letter.

When an advertisement is for the purpose of informing the public or the members of any class of persons that on or before a certain day they may or shall file a petition or exceptions or a remonstrance or protest or objection, or resist the granting of an application or petition, or present or file a claim, or submit a bid, the advertisement shall be published at least once, but may be published two (2) or more times, provided that one (1) publication occurs not less than seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21) days before the occurrence of the act or event.

When an advertisement is for the purpose of informing the public and the advertisement is a notice of delinquent taxes, or notice of the sale of tax claims, the advertisement shall be published either:

Once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks; or

One (1) time, preceded by a one-half (1/2) page notice of advertisement the preceding week. The one-half (1/2) page advertisement shall include notice that a list of uncollectible delinquent taxes is also available for public inspection in accordance with KRS

424.330

during normal business hours at the business address of the city or county and on an identified Internet Web site. The advertisement shall include the business address of the city or county and the Uniform Resource Locator (URL) for the Internet Web site where the document can be viewed. The Internet Web site shall be affiliated with the city or county and contain other information about the city or county government. The delinquent tax list shall be posted on the Internet Web site for a minimum of thirty (30) days and shall be updated weekly.

The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to require the advertisement of notice of delinquent state taxes which are collected by the state.

Any advertisement not coming within the scope of paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, such as one for the purpose of informing the public or the members of any class of persons of the holding of an election, or of a public hearing, or of an examination, or of an opportunity for inspection, or of the due date of a tax or special assessment, shall be published at least once but may be published two (2) or more times, provided that one (1) publication occurs not less than seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21) days before the occurrence of the act or event, or in the case of an inspection period, the inspection period commences.

If the particular statute requiring that an advertisement be published provides that the day upon or by which, or the period within which, an act may or shall be done or a right exercised, or an event may or shall take place, is to be determined by computing time for the day of publication of an advertisement, the advertisement shall be published at least once, promptly, in accordance with the statute, and the computation of time shall be from the day of initial publication.

This section is not intended to supersede or affect any statute providing for notice of the fact that an adversary action in court has been commenced.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 3; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1988, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 346, § 231, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 8, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2019 ch. 35, § 7, effective June 27, 2019.

424.140.
Contents or form of advertisements.

Any advertisement of a hearing, meeting or examination shall state the time, place and purpose of the same.

Any advertisement of an election shall state the time and purpose of the election, and if the election is upon a public question the advertisement shall state the substance of the question.

Any advertisement for bids or of a sale shall describe what is to be bid for or sold, the time and place of the sale or for the receipt of bids, and any special terms of the sale.

Where any statute provides that, within a specified period of time after action by any governmental agency, unit or body, members of the public or anyone interested in or affected by such action shall or may act, and it is provided by statute that notice of such governmental action be published, the advertisement shall state the time and place when and where action may be taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 4; 1960, ch. 168, § 1.

424.145.
Alternative Internet and newspaper publication procedures for local governments. (See LRC Note)

As used in this section:

“Local government” means:

Any urban-county government;

Any consolidated local government;

Any charter county;

Any unified local government; and

In any county containing a population of eighty thousand (80,000) or more based upon the most recent federal decennial census, the county itself or any:

City within the county;

Special district within the county;

School district within the county; or

Special purpose governmental entity within the county; and

“Notice Web site” means an Internet Web site that is maintained by a local government or a third party under contract with the local government, which contains links to the legal advertisements or notices electronically published by the local government.

Local governments may satisfy the requirements of this chapter or any other provision of law requiring the publication of an advertisement in a newspaper by following the alternative procedures established in this section.

In lieu of newspaper publication, a local government may post the required advertisement online on a notice Web site operated by the local government that is accessible to the public at all times in accordance with subsections (4) to (9) of this section. Publication of an advertisement shall be deemed to have occurred on the date the advertisement is posted on the local government’s notice Web site.

In conjunction with an alternative Internet posting, the local government shall publish a newspaper advertisement one (1) time providing notice that the public may view the full advertisement on the notice Web site. The newspaper advertisement shall:

Be not more than six (6) column inches and meet the technical requirements of KRS 424.160(1);

Be published within ten (10) days of the alternative posting on the notice Web site when the purpose of the posting is to inform the public of a completed act, including those acts specified in KRS 424.130(1)(a), or within three (3) days of the posting when the purpose of the posting is to inform the public of the right to take a certain action, including the events specified in KRS 424.130(1)(b) and (d);

Inform the public of the subject matter of the alternative posting, inform the public of its right to inspect any documents associated with the Internet posting by contacting the local government, and provide a mailing and a physical address where a copy of the document may be obtained and the Web address if the document is available online; and

Provide the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the notice Web site address and the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address where the full advertisement may be directly viewed along with a telephone number for the local government.

In addition to specific legal requirements applicable to a particular type of advertisement:

The contents of each alternative Internet posting shall meet the minimum requirements of KRS

424.140

; and

The local government shall make the alternative Internet posting in accordance with the times and periods established by KRS

424.130

, and shall actively maintain the alternative Internet posting on its public Web site:

Until the deadline passes or the event occurs if the substance of the advertisement is intended to advise the public of a time to take action or the occurrence of a future event;

For at least ninety (90) days if the substance of the advertisement is to inform the public of an action taken by the local government, such as the enactment of an ordinance; or

For one (1) year or until updated or replaced with a more recent version if the substance of the advertisement is intended to inform the public about the financial status of the local government, such as annual audits or the budget.

The local government shall display access to any and all alternative Internet postings made pursuant to this section prominently on the homepage or first page of the notice Web site. The section of the notice Web site containing any postings and the actual advertisement shall be made in a manner where the public can readily and with minimal effort identify the location of and easily retrieve the advertisements.

The local government shall provide a conspicuous statement on its notice Web site that individuals who have difficulty in accessing the contents of posted advertisements may contact the local government for information regarding alternative methods of accessing advertisements, which shall include the telephone number of the local government.

As proof of an alternative Internet posting to satisfy any newspaper publication requirement, the local government shall memorialize the posting by capturing the posting in electronic or paper format and shall complete an affidavit signed by the person responsible for causing publications under KRS

424.150

, stating that the local government satisfied the publication requirement by alternative Internet posting. The affidavit shall specify the active dates of the notice Web site posting, the specific statutory requirements being satisfied by the alternative Internet posting, and the notice Web site address where the alternative posting was located, including the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) used for the posting. The local government shall retain the captured posting and the affidavit by the person responsible for publication for a period of three (3) years. Together, the captured posting and the affidavit shall constitute prima facie evidence that the posting was made and occurred as stated within the affidavit.

The failure to cause the newspaper advertisement required in subsection (4) of this section shall not void the action of the local government or negate the enforceability of the matter advertised by alternative Internet posting. Any person who violates the requirements of subsection (4) of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS

424.990

.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2020).
2020 Ky. Acts ch. 91, sec. 73, which was effective April 15, 2020, stated the following:

“

Publishing Requirements

: Notwithstanding
KRS

83A.060

,

91A.040

, and Chapter 424, a county containing a population of more than 90,000 or any city within a county containing a population of more than 90,000, as determined by the 2010 United States Census, may publish enacted ordinances, audits, and bid solicitations by posting the full ordinance, the full audit report including the auditor's opinion letter, or the bid solicitation on an Internet Web site maintained by the county or city government for a period of at least one (1) year. If a county or city publishes ordinances, audits, or bid solicitations on an Internet Web site, the county or city shall also publish an advertisement, in a newspaper qualified in accordance with
KRS

424.120

, with a description of the ordinances, audits, or bid solicitations published on the Internet Web site, including the Uniform Resource Locator (URL) where the documents can be viewed. Any advertisement required to be published in a newspaper under KRS Chapter 424 shall contain the following statement at the end of the advertisement:

“This advertisement was paid for by [insert the name of the governmental body required to advertise in a newspaper] using taxpayer dollars in the amount of $ [insert the amount paid for the advertisement].”

424.147.
Local government posting on Internet if newspaper makes error in publication or fails to publish.

If a newspaper qualified under KRS

424.120

either makes an error or fails in time or substance to make a publication in accordance with KRS

424.130

or

424.140

after receiving the information to be published, a city or county affected thereby may, after it has notice of the error or failure and to avoid undue delay of governmental process and procedure, remedy the error or failure by causing the publication to occur on a notice Web site as defined in KRS

424.145

.

Notwithstanding the time requirements imposed by KRS

424.130

, a city or county publishing to remedy an error or failure of a newspaper under subsection (1) of this section shall immediately cause the publication of the matter on a notice Web site, and this remedial Web site publication shall be deemed in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 87, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

424.150.
Person responsible for publishing.

When any statute providing for newspaper publication of an advertisement does not designate the person responsible for causing the publication to be made, the responsible person shall be:

Where the advertisement is of the filing of a petition or application, the person by whom the same is filed;

Where the advertisement is of an activity or action of:

An individual public officer, the officer himself;

A city, the city clerk if there be one; if not, the mayor;

A county, the county clerk;

A district, or a board, commission or agency of a city, county or district, the chief administrative or executive officer or agent thereof;

A court, the clerk thereof;

A state department or agency, the head thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 5; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 525, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 23, § 15, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The city legislative body would have the responsibility of publishing notice of a special election to be held on general election day concerning an indebtedness that would exceed the city’s annual income.

OAG 67-400

.

If the advertisement is of an activity or action of the county generally, the county clerk is responsible for placing the advertisement and making the decision as to the qualifying newspaper.

OAG 75-215

.

The decision as to the qualifying newspaper should be made by the official immediately responsible for placing the advertisement, where said advertisement is of an activity or action of such officer.

OAG 75-215

.

The county clerk was given the duty of procuring publication of matters of fiscal court action because the county clerk was generally clerk of the fiscal court, but now it is possible that in any county, except Jefferson, the county clerk may decide to not be clerk of fiscal court, in which case the logical reason for performing this clerical duty would no longer exist, and, therefore, the clerical duty of looking after publication of county ordinances was really intended to be imposed upon the clerk of fiscal court.

OAG 78-521

.

424.160.
Rates for newspaper advertising required by law.

For all newspaper advertising required by law, the publisher is entitled to receive payment for each insertion at a rate per column inch. The advertisement shall be set in no larger than seven (7) point type on solid leading. The rate shall not exceed the lowest noncontract classified rate paid by advertisers. The terms and conditions of any volume discounts given to commercial customers shall be extended to public agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Newspapers shall give all local public agencies a written notice of at least thirty (30) days of an advertising rate increase.

If by law or by the nature of the matter to be published, a display form of advertisement is required, or if the person or officer responsible for causing an advertisement to be published determines in his discretion that a display form is practicable or feasible, and so directs the newspaper, the advertisement shall be published in display form and the newspaper shall be entitled to receive its established display rate.

If it is provided by statute that an advertisement shall be published of the filing of a petition or application seeking official action, the filing, if required by other than a governmental official or agency, shall not be deemed complete unless there is deposited with the petition or application an amount sufficient to pay the cost of publication.

The expense of advertisements in judicial proceedings shall be taxed as costs by the clerk of the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 6; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1982, ch. 430, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 8, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

424.170.
Proof of publication.

The affidavit of the publisher or proprietor of a newspaper, stating that an advertisement has been published in his newspaper and the times it was published, attached to a copy of the advertisement, constitutes prima facie evidence that the publication was made as stated in the affidavit.

The affidavit of the person responsible for publishing as described in KRS

424.150

, stating that an advertisement has been delivered by first class mail to each residence within the publication area, attached to a copy of the advertisement, constitutes prima facie evidence that the publication was made as stated in the affidavit and that the expenditure for the cost of postage, all supplies, and reproduction of the advertisement did not exceed the cost of newspaper publication of the advertisement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 7; 1982, ch. 430, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

424.180.
Advertisements of state agencies.

Any advertisement which a state officer, department or agency is required by law to have published shall, if intended to give statewide notice, be published in such newspaper or newspapers, to be designated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, as will provide reasonable statewide coverage, unless the Finance and Administration Cabinet approves an alternative and cost-effective method of delivery. If the advertisement particularly affects a local area, it shall be published, for each county in the area, in a newspaper qualified under KRS

424.120

to publish advertisements for such county, unless the Finance and Administration Cabinet approves an alternative and cost-effective method of delivery. The latter publication shall be in addition to the former, if the advertisement affects the state at large as well as the local area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 8; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXI, § 1, effective April 25, 2006.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Alcoholic beverages, licenses and taxes, notice of intention to apply for license, KRS

243.360

.

Conveyances and encumbrances, general cross indexes, adoption and maintenance, report of examining commission notice, KRS

382.205

.

Department of education, duties of superintendent of public instruction, regulations pertaining to textbook samples, KRS

156.410

.

Department of fish and wildlife resources:

Notices and publications, KRS

150.022

.

Powers of department to make regulations, publication, KRS

150.025

.

Department of highways, advertisements for bids, KRS

176.070

.

Local health units and officers, visiting nurses:

Contracts for work or materials, day labor, KRS

212.460

.

Elections in one county, KRS

212.080

.

Promotion of agriculture and horticulture, revenue bonds, KRS

247.180

.

Sanitation districts and water pollution control:

Contracts for work, materials and supplies, how let, KRS

220.290

.

Investigation and establishment of territorial boundaries, inclusion of city, notice, KRS

220.536

.

Publication of application to create district, KRS

220.090

.

424.190.
Alternatives to newspaper publication abolished — Exception — Information required to be sent to Department for Local Government.

If a statute gives discretion to a public officer or agency or governmental body as to the method of making an advertisement required by the statute, and if a statute provides that an advertisement may be made either by posting or by newspaper publication, the advertisement shall be made by newspaper publication in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Any city may, when the cost of the newspaper publication exceeds the cost of postage, supplies, and reproduction for the alternative method of publication, in lieu of newspaper publication of advertisement, substitute delivery of a copy of the advertisement by first class mail to each residence within the publication area. Any city electing to use the alternative publication methods authorized by this section shall forward an electronic copy of its audit report or an electronic copy of its financial statement, whichever is applicable, to the Department for Local Government in accordance with KRS

91A.040

and

424.220

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 9; 1982, ch. 430, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 52, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 34, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 69, § 78, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 94, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 89, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 10, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

424.195.
Supplementation of printed notice by broadcast in certain cases.

Any official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions who is required by law to publish any legal notice or notice of event may supplement, not to exceed twelve (12) publications unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction thereof by use of radio or television spot announcements, or both, when, in his judgment, the public interest will be served thereby; except, that notices by political subdivisions may be made only by stations having a broadcast studio within the county of origin of the legal notice, and that broadcast notices shall call attention solely to published or posted notices required by statute.

Each radio or television station broadcasting a legal notice or notice of event shall for a period of three (3) months subsequent to such broadcast retain at its office a copy of the transcript of the text of the notices actually broadcast and such shall be available for public inspection.

The radio or television station which broadcasts the legal notice authorized by this section shall be entitled to receive payment of an amount equal to the customary charges of such station for such service.

The publication of legal notices under this section shall be restricted to legal notices relating to those official acts of public officers requiring a final determination by order of any court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 100, § 1.

424.200.
Notice when no newspaper available. [Repealed.]

424.210.
Official newspapers abolished.

No official newspaper shall be designated by any governmental unit for the publication of advertisements for such unit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 11.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The fiscal court is prohibited from designating an official newspaper by the provisions of this section.

OAG 69-173

.

424.215.
Advertising by public agencies — Rates charged.

Notwithstanding KRS

65.070

,

83A.060

,

91A.040

,

160.463

,

424.180

,

424.190

,

424.220

,

424.230

,

424.250

,

424.260

,

424.270

,

424.330

, any public agency required to advertise or publish notices or documents in a newspaper shall be charged the lowest rate generally charged for advertising by the newspaper.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 106, § 11, effective June 20, 2005.